Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 5.2 The Rhode Island Works Program
40-5.2-12.
Work requirements for receipt of cash assistance.

The department of human services and the department of labor and training shall assess the applicant/parent or non-parent caretaker relative’s work experience, educational, and vocational abilities, and the department, together with the parent, shall develop and enter into a mandatory, individual employment plan in accordance with §

40-5.2-10(e)

.

In the case of a family including two (2) parents, at least one of the parents shall be required to participate in an employment plan leading to full-time employment. The department may also require the second parent in a two-parent (2) household to develop an employment plan if, and when, the youngest child reaches six (6) years of age or older.

The written, individual employment plan shall specify, at minimum, the immediate steps necessary to support a goal of long-term, economic independence.

All applicants and participants in the Rhode Island works employment program must attend and participate in required appointments, employment plan development, and employment-related activities, unless temporarily exempt for reasons specified in this chapter.

A recipient/participant temporarily exempted from the work requirements may participate in an individual employment plan on a voluntary basis, however, the individual remains subject to the same program compliance requirements as a participant without a temporary exemption.

The individual employment plan shall specify the participant’s work activity(ies) and the supportive services that will be provided by the department to enable the participant to engage in the work activity(ies).

Work requirements for single-parent families. In single-parent households, the participant parent or non-parent caretaker relative in the cash assistance payment, shall participate as a condition of eligibility, for a minimum of twenty (20) hours per week if the youngest child in the home is under the age of six (6), and for a minimum of thirty (30) hours per week if the youngest child in the home is six (6) years of age or older, in one or more of their required work activities, as appropriate, in order to help the parent obtain stable, full-time, paid employment, as determined by the department of human services and the department of labor and training; provided, however, that he or she shall begin with intensive employment services as the first step in the individual employment plan. Required work activities are as follows:

At least twenty (20) hours per week must come from participation in one or more of the following ten (10) work activities:

Unsubsidized employment;

Subsidized private-sector employment;

Subsidized public-sector employment;

Work experience;

On-the-job training;

Job search and job readiness;

Community service programs;

Vocational educational training not to exceed twelve (12) months; provided, however, that a participant who successfully completes their first year of education at the community college of Rhode Island may participate in vocational education training for an additional twelve (12) months;

Providing childcare services to another participant parent who is participating in an approved community service program; and

Adult education in an intensive work-readiness program.

Above twenty (20) hours per week, the parent may participate in one or more of the following three (3) activities in order to satisfy a thirty-hour (30) requirement:

Job skills training directly related to employment;

Education directly related to employment; and

Satisfactory attendance at a secondary school or in a course of study leading to a certificate of general equivalence if it is a teen parent under the age of twenty (20) who is without a high school diploma or General Equivalence Diploma (GED).

In the case of a parent under the age of twenty (20), attendance at a secondary school or the equivalent during the month, or twenty (20) hours per week on average for the month in education directly related to employment, will be counted as engaged in work.

A parent who participates in a work experience or community service program for the maximum number of hours per week allowable by the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) is deemed to have participated in his or her required minimum hours per week in core activities if actual participation falls short of his or her required minimum hours per week.

A parent who has been determined to have a physical or mental impairment affecting employment, but who has not been found eligible for Social Security Disability benefits or Supplemental Security Income must participate in his or her rehabilitation employment plan as developed with the office of rehabilitation services that leads to employment and/or to receipt of disability benefits through the Social Security Administration.

A required work activity may be any other work activity permissible under federal TANF provisions or state-defined Rhode Island works program activity, including up to ten (10) hours of activities required by a parent’s department of children, youth and families service plan.

Exemptions from work requirements for the single-parent family. Work requirements outlined in subsection (g) shall not apply to a single parent if (and for so long as) the department finds that he or she is:

Caring for a child below the age of one; provided, however, that a parent may opt for the deferral from an individual employment plan for a maximum of twelve (12) months during the twenty-four (24) months of eligibility for cash assistance and provided, further, that a minor parent without a high school diploma or the equivalent, and who is not married, shall not be exempt for more than twelve (12) weeks from the birth of the child;

Caring for a disabled family member who resides in the home and requires full-time care;

A recipient of Social Security Disability benefits or Supplemental Security Income or other disability benefits that have the same standard of disability as defined by the Social Security Administration;

An individual receiving assistance who is a victim of domestic violence as determined by the department in accordance with rules and regulations;

An applicant for assistance in her third trimester or a pregnant woman in her third trimester who is a recipient of assistance and has medical documentation that she cannot work;

An individual otherwise exempt by the department as defined in rules and regulations promulgated by the department.

Work requirement for two-parent families.

In families consisting of two (2) parents, one or both parents are required, and shall be engaged in, work activities as defined below, for an individual or combined total of at least thirty-five (35) hours per week during the month, not fewer than thirty (30) hours per week of which are attributable to one or more of the following listed work activities; provided, however, that he or she shall begin with intensive employment services as the first step in the individual employment plan. Two-parent work requirements shall be defined as the following:

Unsubsidized employment;

Subsidized private-sector employment;

Subsidized public-sector employment;

Work experience;

On-the-job training;

Job search and job readiness;

Community service program;

Vocational educational training not to exceed twelve (12) months; provided, however, that a participant who successfully completes their first year of education at the community college of Rhode Island may participate in vocational education training for an additional twelve (12) months;

The provision of childcare services to a participant individual who is participating in a community service program; and

Adult education in an intensive work-readiness program.

Above thirty (30) hours per week, the following three (3) activities may also count for participation:

(i)

Job skills training directly related to employment;

(ii)

Education directly related to employment; and

(iii)

Satisfactory attendance at secondary school or in a course of study leading to a certificate of general equivalence.

(3)

A family with two (2) parents, in which one or both parents participate in a work experience or community service program, shall be deemed to have participated in core work activities for the maximum number of hours per week allowable by the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) if actual participation falls short of his or her required minimum hours per week.

(4)

If the family receives childcare assistance and an adult in the family is not disabled or caring for a severely disabled child, then the work-eligible individuals must be participating in work activities for an average of at least fifty-five (55) hours per week to count as a two-parent family engaged in work for the month.

(5)

At least fifty (50) of the fifty-five (55) hours per week must come from participation in the activities listed in subsection (i)(1).

Above fifty (50) hours per week, the three (3) activities listed in subsection (i)(2) may also count as participation.

(6)

A family with two (2) parents receiving child care in which one or both parents participate in a work experience or community service program for the maximum number of hours per week allowable by the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) will be considered to have met their required core hours if actual participation falls short of the required minimum hours per week. For families that need additional hours beyond the core activity requirement, these hours must be satisfied in some other TANF work activity.

Exemptions from work requirements for two-parent families. Work requirements outlined in subsection (i) shall not apply to two-parent families if (and for so long as) the department finds that:

Both parents receive Supplemental Security Income (SSI);

One parent receives SSI, and the other parent is caring for a disabled family member who resides in the home and who requires full-time care; or

The parents are otherwise exempt by the department as defined in rules and regulations.

Failure to comply with work requirements — Sanctions and terminations.

The cash assistance to which an otherwise eligible family/assistance unit is entitled under this chapter shall be reduced for three (3) months, whether or not consecutive, in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the department, whenever any participant, without good cause as defined by the department in its rules and regulations, has failed to enter into an individual employment plan; has failed to attend a required appointment; has refused or quit employment; or has failed to comply with any other requirements for the receipt of cash assistance under this chapter. If the family’s benefit has been reduced, benefits shall be restored to the full amount beginning with the initial payment made on the first of the month following the month in which the parent: (i) Enters into an individual employment plan or rehabilitation plan and demonstrates compliance with the terms thereof; or (ii) Demonstrates compliance with the terms of his or her existing individual employment plan or rehabilitation plan, as such plan may be amended by agreement of the parent and the department.

In the case where appropriate child care has been made available in accordance with this chapter, a participant’s failure, without good cause, to accept a bona fide offer of work, including full-time, part-time, and/or temporary employment, or unpaid work experience or community service, shall be deemed a failure to comply with the work requirements of this section and shall result in reduction or termination of cash assistance, as defined by the department in rules and regulations duly promulgated.

If the family/assistance unit’s benefit has been reduced for a total of three (3) months, whether or not consecutive in accordance with this section due to the failure by one or more parents to enter into an individual employment plan, or failure to comply with the terms of his or her individual employment plan, or the failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter, cash assistance to the entire family shall end. The family/assistance unit may reapply for benefits, and the benefits shall be restored to the family/assistance unit in the full amount the family/assistance unit is otherwise eligible for under this chapter beginning on the first of the month following the month in which all parents in the family/assistance unit who are subject to the employment or rehabilitation plan requirements under this chapter: (i) Enter into an individual employment or rehabilitation plan as applicable, and demonstrate compliance with the terms thereof, or (ii) Demonstrate compliance with the terms of the parent’s individual employment or rehabilitation employment plan in effect at the time of termination of benefits, as such plan may be amended by agreement of the parent and the department.

Up to ten (10) days following a notice of adverse action to reduce or terminate benefits under this subsection, the client may request the opportunity to meet with a social worker to identify the reasons for non-compliance, establish good cause, and seek to resolve any issues that have prevented the parent from complying with the employment plan requirements.

Participants whose cases had closed in sanction status pursuant to Rhode Island’s prior Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program (federal TANF described in Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.), the family independence program, more specifically, § 40-5.1-9(2)(c) [repealed], due to failure to comply with the cash assistance program requirements, but who had received less than forty-eight (48) months of cash assistance at the time of closure, and who reapply for cash assistance under the Rhode Island works program, must demonstrate full compliance, as defined by the department in its rules and regulations, before they shall be eligible for cash assistance pursuant to this chapter.

Good cause. Good cause for failing to meet any program requirements including leaving employment, and failure to fulfill documentation requirements, shall be outlined in rules and regulations promulgated by the department of human services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 23, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 352, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 405, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 26; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

40-5.2-13.
Income deeming.

Parent, stepparent, grandparent, and sponsor income deeming.

Parents. For purposes of determining eligibility for and the amount of cash assistance to which a family is entitled under this chapter, the income of a child shall include the income of his/her parent(s). For purposes of this section, the term “income” has the meaning prescribed in §

40-5.2-10(g)

.

Stepparents. For purposes of determining eligibility for and the amount of cash assistance to which a family is entitled under this chapter, the income of a child shall include the income of the child’s stepparent (if living in the same house as the child) minus the sum of: (1) The first ninety dollars ($90) of the stepparent’s earned income for the month; (2) The standard of need for a family of the same composition as the stepparent (but excluding any person included in the child’s family); (3) Amounts paid by the stepparent to individuals not living in the stepparent’s home and claimed by him or her as dependent for federal tax purposes; and (4) Alimony or child support payments made by the stepparent with respect to individuals not living in such household.

Grandparents. The income of a child whose parent is under the age of eighteen (18) shall include any income of the child’s grandparents, if the grandparents are living in the same home as the child and his or her parent, to the same extent that income of a stepparent is included under subsection (b).

Sponsors. Sponsor deeming with respect to eligible aliens who are applicants for cash assistance shall be applied in accordance with Section 421 of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-193, PRWORA) [8 U.S.C. § 1631] and under rules and regulations to be promulgated by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-14.
Reporting of income and resources by participants.

All participants are responsible for reporting changes in income, resources, family composition or other factors that can affect the family’s eligibility or payment level within ten (10) days of the change in circumstances.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-15.
Reporting absence.

Whenever adult family member(s) become aware that a minor child in their household has been or will be temporarily absent from the home, the adult family member(s) have the responsibility to report such absence of a minor child from the home by the end of the five-day (5) period that begins with the date that the adult family member(s) become aware that the minor child has been or will be absent from the home for a period of thirty (30) or more consecutive days.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-16.
Minimum payment.

No payment of assistance under §

40-5.2-11(e)

shall be made for any month if the amount of such payment would be less than ten dollars ($10.00), but a family with respect to whom a payment of assistance is denied solely by reason of this section shall otherwise be deemed to be a recipient of assistance under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-17.
Assistance not assignable; exemption from process.

Except as otherwise provided for herein, cash assistance shall not be transferable or assignable at law or in equity, and none of the money paid or payable under this chapter shall be subject to execution, levy, attachment, garnishment, or other legal process, or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-18.
Up-front cash program.

The department has the authority under this chapter to develop a non-assistance up-front cash program for recipients in accordance with federal TANF guidelines.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-19.
Appropriate child care necessary for work requirement.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no single parent, or both parents meeting all other program requirements, shall be required to work or participate in employment plan activities or rehabilitative plan activities to the extent that appropriate child care is necessary for the parent to do so and the department determines that appropriate child care is unavailable for fiscal or other reasons.

For purposes of this section, “appropriate child care” means child care that is provided by a person or organization qualified and authorized to provide care by the department of children, youth and families or such other lawful providers as determined by the department of children, youth and families. Child care shall be considered “necessary” under this section for any children below the age of thirteen (13), or any children age thirteen (13) years or older, who are under supervision of the family court or who require care because of a physical or mental impairment.

The department shall provide transportation support in either the form of a bus pass for use in traveling to work activities, training, or other plan-related needs, or in the form of an allowance for transportation costs necessary to comply with the employment plan as defined in department rules and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-20.
Childcare assistance — Families or assistance units eligible.

The department shall provide appropriate child care to every participant who is eligible for cash assistance and who requires child care in order to meet the work requirements in accordance with this chapter.

Low-income child care. The department shall provide child care to all other working families with incomes at or below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level if, and to the extent, these other families require child care in order to work at paid employment as defined in the department’s rules and regulations. The department shall also provide child care to families with incomes below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level if, and to the extent, these families require child care to participate on a short-term basis, as defined in the department’s rules and regulations, in training, apprenticeship, internship, on-the-job training, work experience, work immersion, or other job-readiness/job-attachment program sponsored or funded by the human resource investment council (governor’s workforce board) or state agencies that are part of the coordinated program system pursuant to §

42-102-11

. Effective from January 1, 2021, through June 30, 2022, the department shall also provide childcare assistance to families with incomes below one hundred eighty percent (180%) of the federal poverty level when such assistance is necessary for a member of these families to enroll or maintain enrollment in a Rhode Island public institution of higher education provided that eligibility to receive funding is capped when expenditures reach $200,000 for this provision. Effective July 1, 2022, the department shall also provide childcare assistance to families with incomes below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level when such assistance is necessary for a member of these families to enroll or maintain enrollment in a Rhode Island public institution of higher education.

No family/assistance unit shall be eligible for childcare assistance under this chapter if the combined value of its liquid resources exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000), which corresponds to the amount permitted by the federal government under the state plan and set forth in the administrative rulemaking process by the department. Liquid resources are defined as any interest(s) in property in the form of cash or other financial instruments or accounts that are readily convertible to cash or cash equivalents. These include, but are not limited to: cash, bank, credit union, or other financial institution savings, checking, and money market accounts; certificates of deposit or other time deposits; stocks; bonds; mutual funds; and other similar financial instruments or accounts. These do not include educational savings accounts, plans, or programs; retirement accounts, plans, or programs; or accounts held jointly with another adult, not including a spouse. The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to determine the ownership and source of the funds in the joint account.

As a condition of eligibility for childcare assistance under this chapter, the parent or caretaker relative of the family must consent to, and must cooperate with, the department in establishing paternity, and in establishing and/or enforcing child support and medical support orders for any children in the family receiving appropriate child care under this section in accordance with the applicable sections of title 15, as amended, unless the parent or caretaker relative is found to have good cause for refusing to comply with the requirements of this subsection.

For purposes of this section, “appropriate child care” means child care, including infant, toddler, preschool, nursery school, and school-age, that is provided by a person or organization qualified, approved, and authorized to provide the care by the state agency or agencies designated to make the determinations in accordance with the provisions set forth herein.

Families with incomes below one hundred percent (100%) of the applicable federal poverty level guidelines shall be provided with free child care. Families with incomes greater than one hundred percent (100%) and less than two hundred percent (200%) of the applicable federal poverty guideline shall be required to pay for some portion of the child care they receive, according to a sliding-fee scale adopted by the department in the department’s rules, not to exceed seven percent (7%) of income as defined in subsection (h) of this section.

Families who are receiving childcare assistance and who become ineligible for childcare assistance as a result of their incomes exceeding two hundred percent (200%) of the applicable federal poverty guidelines shall continue to be eligible for childcare assistance until their incomes exceed three hundred percent (300%) of the applicable federal poverty guidelines. To be eligible, the families must continue to pay for some portion of the child care they receive, as indicated in a sliding-fee scale adopted in the department’s rules, not to exceed seven percent (7%) of income as defined in subsection (h) of this section, and in accordance with all other eligibility standards.

In determining the type of child care to be provided to a family, the department shall take into account the cost of available childcare options; the suitability of the type of care available for the child; and the parent’s preference as to the type of child care.

For purposes of this section, “income” for families receiving cash assistance under §

40-5.2-11

means gross, earned income and unearned income, subject to the income exclusions in §§

40-5.2-10(g)(2)

and

40-5.2-10(g)(3)

, and income for other families shall mean gross, earned and unearned income as determined by departmental regulations.

The caseload estimating conference established by chapter 17 of title 35 shall forecast the expenditures for child care in accordance with the provisions of §

35-17-1

.

In determining eligibility for childcare assistance for children of members of reserve components called to active duty during a time of conflict, the department shall freeze the family composition and the family income of the reserve component member as it was in the month prior to the month of leaving for active duty. This shall continue until the individual is officially discharged from active duty.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 15, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 18, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 15, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 478, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 17, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 7, § 7; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 26; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 13, § 6, effective July 6, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

40-5.2-21.
Eligibility for medical benefits.

Every member of any family/assistance unit eligible for cash assistance under this chapter shall be eligible for medical assistance through the RIte Care or RIte Share programs, as determined by the department, subject to the provisions of §

40-8-1(d)

and provided, further, that eligibility for medical assistance, must qualify for federal financial participation pursuant to the provisions of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.

If a family becomes ineligible for cash assistance payments under this chapter as a result of excess earnings from employment, the family/assistance unit shall continue to be eligible for medical assistance through the RIte Care or RIte Share program for a period of twelve (12) months or until employer-paid family healthcare coverage begins, subject to the provisions of §

40-8-1(d)

, whichever occurs first; and provided, further, that those eligible for medical assistance must qualify for federal financial participation pursuant to the provisions of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 26.

40-5.2-22.
Emergency expenses.

To the extent that the department has allocated resources for this purpose, the department is authorized to provide assistance to families receiving assistance in accordance with this chapter to meet emergency needs that cannot be met with the cash resources available to the family. The emergency assistance shall be limited to the lesser of actual cost or the sum of two hundred dollars ($200). Except as provided by the department by regulation, no expense shall be reimbursable unless the department has pre-approved the expenditure. Emergency assistance includes, but is not limited to, payment of moving expenses for families who are forced to move their place of residence and payments for emergency transportation needs used in connection with participation in any program approved under this chapter.

In the event of a catastrophe caused by fire, flood, lightning, severe wind, or other act of nature, the department may establish by regulation the authorization of catastrophic assistance funds not subject to the limit of two hundred dollars ($200) specified in subsection (a). These regulations shall specify the criteria under which funds for shelter, clothing, or essential household equipment and furnishings may be authorized in the event of a catastrophe.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-23.
Post-employment incentive bonus.

The family/assistance unit may be eligible for an incentive bonus payment, if the participant is employed and is working at least thirty (30) hours per week or more for a single-parent family and thirty-five (35) hours per week for a two-parent family at the time of closure on cash assistance and remains employed and continues to work at least thirty (30) hours per week or thirty (35) hours per week or more, not to exceed a period of twelve (12) months in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-24.
Overpayment and underpayment of benefits.

The department shall promptly take all necessary steps to correct any overpayment or underpayment of cash assistance paid under this chapter, and, in the case of:

An overpayment to an individual who is a current recipient of cash assistance (including a recipient whose overpayment occurred during a prior period of ineligibility), recovery will be made by repayment by the individual or by reducing the amount of any future cash assistance payable to the family of which he or she is a member, except that the recovery shall not result in the reduction of cash assistance payable for any month, such that cash assistance, when added to its income, is less than ninety percent (90%) of the standard of assistance for a family/assistance unit with the same composition with no other income (and, in the case of an individual to whom no payment is made for a month solely by reason of recovery of any overpayment, the individual shall be deemed to be a recipient of cash assistance for that month);

An overpayment to any individual who is no longer receiving cash assistance under the plan, recovery shall be made by appropriate action by the department under federal and state law against the income or resources of the individual, the family, or the prior assistance unit; and

An underpayment, the corrective payment shall be disregarded in determining the income of the family, and shall be disregarded in determining its resources in the month the corrective payment is made and in the following month; except that no recovery need be attempted or carried out under subsection (2), other than in a case involving fraud on the part of the recipient where the cost of recovery would equal or exceed the amount of overpayment involved.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-25.
Hearings.

Any applicant, recipient, or participant aggrieved because of a decision by the department, including but not limited to, a decision regarding eligibility for benefits, the amount of benefits, terms of an employment plan, or a delay in making a decision with respect to an application for assistance shall be entitled to an appeal. The department shall provide an applicant, recipient, or participant with written notice of a decision to deny benefits under this chapter and shall provide recipients written notice at least ten (10) days in advance of a decision to terminate or reduce benefits to the family/assistance unit. Notices shall be easy to understand and shall explain the reason for the department’s decision and cite the relevant section of the department’s regulations. The family may appeal the decision by filing a written request with the department within thirty (30) days of the date the notice was mailed. If the recipient files the request within ten (10) days of the date the notice was mailed, the recipient may receive benefits without reduction pending the outcome of the appeal.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-26.
Records as to assistance.

All records pertaining to the administration of public assistance pursuant to this chapter and chapter 8 of this title are hereby declared to constitute a confidential matter.

In furtherance thereof:

It shall be unlawful for any person to make use of, or cause to be used, any information contained in records for purposes not directly connected with administration thereof, except with the consent of the individual concerned.

The director of the department shall have the power to establish rules and regulations governing the custody, use, and preservation of the records, papers, files, and communications dealing with the administration of public assistance. The rules and regulations shall have the same force and effect as law.

The records shall be produced in response to subpoena duces tecum properly issued by any federal or state court; provided, however, that the purpose for which the subpoena is sought is directly connected with the administration of public assistance. No subpoena shall be issued by a court asking either for the records, or for persons having custody or access to the records, unless the litigation involved in matters is directly connected with the administration of public assistance.

Any person who by law is entitled to a list of individuals receiving any of the assistance as provided in this chapter shall not publish, or cause to be published, the list except by the express consent of the director of the department, or to make use of thereof for purposes not directly connected with the administration thereof.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this section, or the lawful rules and regulations made hereunder, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than two hundred dollars ($200), or shall be imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit the director of the department, or his or her agents duly authorized for that purpose, from issuing any statistical material data, or publishing, or causing the data to be published whenever he or she shall deem it to be in the public interest.

The director of the department may inquire into the records of any state department or agency in the course of his or her administration of public assistance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-27.
Department of human services.

Except as otherwise provided for herein, the director of the department of human services is responsible for implementation of this chapter.

No later than March 1 of each year, the director shall submit a plan to the general assembly showing how, within available resources, the department expects to operate the programs authorized under this chapter in the succeeding fiscal year. The director will provide an annual report of program impact on families served by the Rhode Island works program and indicators of success. The report shall also reflect the child support guidelines issued from time to time by the Rhode Island family court.

The department is empowered and authorized to submit its plan for services under the act to the federal government or any agency or department thereof having funds available for benefits to low-income families for approval pursuant to the provisions of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq. The department shall act for the state in any negotiations relative to the submission and approval of the plan and/or waivers and may make any arrangement or changes in its plan and/or waivers not inconsistent with this chapter that may be required or permitted by the Social Security Act or rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto to obtain and retain approval and to secure for this state the benefits of the provisions of the federal act relating to family assistance. The department shall make reports to the federal government or any agency or department thereof, in the form and nature required by it, and shall in all respects comply with any request or direction of the federal government or any agency or department thereof that may be necessary to assure the correctness and verification of the reports.

The department of human services is hereby authorized and directed to expedite the implementation of this act by submitting to the federal government, on behalf of the state, the state plan amendments and any federal waiver requests it deems necessary to fully implement the provisions of this act and to secure for this state the benefits of federal financial participation and/or grants for the above-referenced programs, as amended, pursuant to Titles IV and XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 601 et seq. and 1396 et seq., and Subchapter II-B of the Child Care and Development Block Grant codified at 42 U.S.C. § 9858 et seq., and as these acts may hereafter be re-codified or amended by acts as may be considered and enacted by the Congress of the United States.

Any provisions of this chapter and chapters 6 and 6.2 of this title and §

42-12-3

that are inconsistent with federal law or regulations shall be void unless the department receives an exemption or waiver from the federal government to implement the provision.

The department of human services is hereby authorized and directed to implement this act only in accordance with the terms and conditions of state plan amendments, waivers, or other approvals granted by the federal government and changes in rules, regulations, and policies of the department that are promulgated pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-28.
Rules and regulations.

The director of the department of human services shall, pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42, promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Any reference to the department’s rulemaking process is pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.

40-5.2-29.
Noncustodial parents — Employment obligations.

Any noncustodial parent who is required by order of the family court to pay support to any family receiving assistance of any kind under this chapter, and who is unemployed and, in whole or in part as a result of the unemployment, has failed to comply with all of the terms of the support order may, if permitted by a justice of the family court, purge his or her contempt by accepting employment approved by the court, paying wages no less than the state minimum wage and/or by participation on a full-time basis in a rapid job-placement program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 16, § 1.